Wyoming, session 2025, SF0162.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-338 is created to read:

21-13-338. Expenditure of funds generated for
teachers.

(a) Beginning with school year 2025-2026 and for each
school year thereafter and except as provided in subsection
SF0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0730
(b) of this section, all funds allocated for teachers by
the education resource block grant model under Attachment
A(b)(iii) through (v), including resources generated for
salaries, health insurance and other benefits, shall be
separately accounted for by each school district and shall
be expended only for the purposes of teacher salaries and
benefits.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to
charter schools operating under chapter 3, article 3 of
this title, alternative schools operating under W.S.
21-13-309(m)(v)(B), schools with less than forty-nine (49)
students or school districts with less than two hundred
forty-three (243) students.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit a school district from allocating or expending
funds provided under the education resource block grant
model for teacher resources specified in subsection (a) of
this section. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, school districts shall not expend teacher
resources specified in subsection (a) of this section for
SF0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0730
purposes other than those specified in subsection (a) of
this section.

(d) The department of education shall collect data
from school districts on the amounts expended on teacher
salaries, health insurance, other benefits and the number
of teachers employed by each school district in accordance
with W.S. 21-2-203. Not later than October 1 of each year,
the department shall report to the joint education interim
committee on the data collected under this subsection.

Section 2.

(a) Not later than October 1, 2025 and again on
October 1, 2026, the department of education shall report
to the joint education interim committee and any committee
established for the recalibration of the education resource
block grant model under W.S. 21-13-309(t) on findings and
recommendations on data collected under W.S. 21-13-338(d),
as created by section 1 of this act. The report required
under this subsection shall include any recommendations for
refinement of components within the education resource
SF0162

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0730
block grant model allocated for teacher salaries, health
insurance and other benefits.

(b) Not later than June 30, 2026, the data advisory
committee established under W.S. 21-2-203(d) shall provide
recommendations to the state superintendent of public
instruction to clearly identify expenditures on teacher
salaries, health insurance and other benefits by school
districts for purposes of implementing W.S. 21-13-338, as
created by section 1 of this act.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0162